Rhode Island statutes. Title 1 Aeronautics
Chapter 1 Airports Division — Aeronautics Advisory Board [Repealed.]

1-1-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 106, P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 10, impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 2, G.L. 1956 §

1-1-1

; Repealed by P.L. 2000, ch. 371, § 1, effective July 19, 2000. For present comparable provisions, see §

1-2-1

.

1-1-2 — 1-1-5.
Repealed.